Maryland, session 2025, SB0091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Economic Development
1–101.
(a) In this division the following words have the meanings indicated.
(c) “Department” means the Department of Commerce.
SUBTITLE 11. INCOME TAX BENEFIT TRANSFER PROGRAM.
6–1101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY” MEANS A TECHNOLOGY COMPANY
THAT, ON THE DATE ON WHICH THE COMPANY FILES AN APPLICATION UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE AND THE DATE OF THE EXCHANGE OF AN INCOME TAX BENEFIT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) (I) 1. HAS AT LEAST 1 QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE IN THE STATE
IF THE COMPANY HAS BEEN INCORPORATED FOR LESS THAN 3 YEARS;
2. HAS AT LEAST 5 QUALIFIED EMPLOYEES IN THE
STATE IF THE COMPANY HAS BEEN INCORPORATED FOR AT LEAST 3 YEARS BUT LESS
THAN 5 YEARS; OR
3. HAS AT LEAST 10 QUALIFIED EMPLOYEES IN THE
STATE IF THE COMPANY HAS BEEN INCORPORATED FOR AT LEAST 5 YEARS; AND
(II) HAS FEWER THAN 225 EMPLOYEES IN THE UNITED STATES;
(2) IS IN GOOD STANDING;
(3) IS CURRENT IN THE PAYMENT OF ALL TAX OBLIGATIONS TO THE
STATE OR ANY UNIT OR SUBDIVISION OF THE STATE;

SENATE BILL 91 3
(4) IS NOT IN DEFAULT UNDER THE TERMS OF ANY CONTRACT WITH,
INDEBTEDNESS TO, OR GRANT FROM THE STATE OR ANY SUBDIVISION OF THE
STATE; AND
(5) IS ENGAGED IN THE RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR
COMMERCIALIZATION OF INNOVATIVE AND PROPRIETARY TECHNOLOGY IN AN
ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY SECTOR.
(C) “ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY SECTOR” MEANS A TECHNOLOGY SECTOR
IDENTIFIED IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 6–1102 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) (1) “QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(I) 1. IS EMPLOYED BY A TECHNOLOGY COMPANY FOR
CONSIDERATION FOR AT LEAST 35 HOURS EACH WEEK OR RENDERS ANY OTHER
STANDARD OF SERVICE GENERALLY ACCEPTED BY CUSTOM OR PRACTICE AS
FULL–TIME EMPLOYMENT AND WHOSE WAGES ARE SUBJECT TO WITHHOLDING
UNDER TITLE 10 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE; OR
2. IS A PARTNER OF A TECHNOLOGY COMPANY FOR AT
LEAST 35 HOURS EACH WEEK OR RENDERS ANY OTHER STANDARD OF SERVICE
GENERALLY ACCEPTED BY CUSTOM OR PRACTICE AS FULL–TIME EMPLOYMENT AND
WHOSE DISTRIBUTIVE SHARE OF INCOME, GAIN, LOSS, OR DEDUCTION OR
GUARANTEED PAYMENTS ARE SUBJECT TO THE PAYMENT OF ESTIMATED TAXES
UNDER TITLE 10 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE; AND
(II) RECEIVES FROM THE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY HEALTH
BENEFITS UNDER A GROUP HEALTH PLAN, A HEALTH BENEFITS PLAN, OR A POLICY
OR CONTRACT OF HEALTH INSURANCE COVERING MORE THAN ONE INDIVIDUAL.
(2) “QUALIFIED EMPLOYEE” DOES NOT INCLUDE AN INDIVIDUAL
WHO WORKS AS AN INDEPENDENT CONTRACTOR OR ON A CONSULTING BASIS FOR
THE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY.
(E) “TECHNOLOGY COMPANY” MEANS A CORPORATION THAT:
(1) IS ORGANIZED FOR PROFIT;
(2) HAS THE CORPORATION’S HEADQUARTERS OR BASE OF
OPERATIONS IN THE STATE; AND

SENATE BILL 91
(3) IS ENGAGED IN THE RESEARCH, DEVELOPMENT, OR
COMMERCIALIZATION OF INNOVATIVE AND PROPRIETARY TECHNOLOGY.
6–1102.
(A) THERE IS AN INCOME TAX BENEFIT TRANSFER PROGRAM IN THE
DEPARTMENT.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE PROGRAM IS TO ALLOW, SUBJECT TO THE
LIMITATIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE, ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANIES IN THE STATE
WITH UNUSED AMOUNTS OF NET OPERATING LOSS SUBTRACTION MODIFICATIONS
ALLOWED UNDER § 10–310 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE OR INCOME TAX
CREDITS ALLOWED UNDER § 10–721 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE TO TRANSFER
THOSE TAX BENEFITS FOR USE BY OTHER BUSINESS TAXPAYERS IN THE STATE TO
ASSIST IN FUNDING EXPENSES INCURRED BY THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY
COMPANIES IN CONNECTION WITH OPERATIONS IN THE STATE.
(C) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER,
SHALL ADMINISTER THE PROGRAM.
(D) (1) AFTER CONSULTING WITH THE DEPARTMENT AND THE
MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF LABOR, EACH YEAR THE MARYLAND ECONOMIC
DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION SHALL:
(I) EVALUATE THE POTENTIAL ECONOMIC GROWTH OF
MARYLAND’S TECHNOLOGY SECTORS; AND
(II) RECOMMEND ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY SECTORS TO THE
DEPARTMENT.
(2) EACH YEAR THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(I) CONSIDER THE RECOMMENDATION OF THE MARYLAND
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT COMMISSION; AND
(II) ESTABLISH A LIST OF TECHNOLOGY SECTORS THAT WILL BE
ELIGIBLE FOR THE INCOME TAX BENEFIT TRANSFERS UNDER THIS SUBTITLE.
6–1103.
(A) (1) AN ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY MAY APPLY TO THE
DEPARTMENT FOR THE TRANSFER OF UNUSED AMOUNTS OF NET OPERATING LOSS
SUBTRACTION MODIFICATIONS ALLOWED UNDER § 10–310 OF THE TAX – GENERAL

SENATE BILL 91 5
ARTICLE OR INCOME TAX CREDITS ALLOWED UNDER § 10–721 OF THE TAX –
GENERAL ARTICLE TO ANOTHER TAXPAYER IN THE STATE THAT IS NOT AFFILIATED
WITH THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY IN EXCHANGE FOR CONSIDERATION
EQUAL TO AT LEAST 80% OF THE AMOUNT OF THE TRANSFERRED TAX BENEFIT.
(2) AN ENTITY SHALL BE DEEMED TO BE AFFILIATED WITH AN
ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY IF THE ENTITY DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY OWNS
OR CONTROLS AT LEAST 5% OF THE VOTING RIGHTS OR VALUE OF ALL CLASSES OF
STOCK OF BOTH THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY AND THE TAXPAYER TO
WHICH THE INCOME TAX BENEFITS ARE SURRENDERED.
(B) IN ORDER TO RECEIVE APPROVAL FOR A TRANSFER OF INCOME TAX
BENEFITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION, A TECHNOLOGY COMPANY SHALL
SUBMIT TO THE DEPARTMENT AN APPLICATION THAT:
(1) DEMONSTRATES THAT THE APPLICANT IS AN ELIGIBLE
TECHNOLOGY COMPANY;
(2) SPECIFIES THE AMOUNT OF THE UNUSED AMOUNTS OF NET
OPERATING LOSS SUBTRACTION MODIFICATIONS ALLOWED UNDER § 10–310 OF THE
TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE OR INCOME TAX CREDITS ALLOWED UNDER § 10–721 OF
THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE THAT THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY IS
OTHERWISE ALLOWED; AND
(3) INCLUDES ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE DEPARTMENT
REQUIRES.
(C) THE AMOUNT OF THE TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS SHALL BE
DETERMINED AS FOLLOWS:
(1) THE TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFIT FOR A NET OPERATING LOSS
SUBTRACTION MODIFICATION IS THE UNUSED AMOUNT OF THE LOSS MULTIPLIED
BY THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY’S ANTICIPATED APPORTIONMENT
FACTOR UNDER § 10–402 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE FOR THE TAXABLE YEAR
IN WHICH THE BENEFIT IS TRANSFERRED, AND SUBSEQUENTLY MULTIPLIED BY THE
CORPORATE INCOME TAX RATE UNDER § 10–105 OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;
AND
(2) THE TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFIT FOR A RESEARCH AND
DEVELOPMENT TAX CREDIT IS THE UNUSED AMOUNT OF THE CREDIT.

SENATE BILL 91
(D) (1) SUBJECT TO THE LIMITATIONS OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT, IN COOPERATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, SHALL REVIEW AND
APPROVE APPLICATIONS BY ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANIES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL PRIORITIZE APPROVING
APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED BY ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANIES ENGAGED IN
CLEAN ENERGY INNOVATION, AS DEFINED UNDER § 10–801 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(E) (1) FOR EACH CALENDAR YEAR, THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TRANSFERS
OF INCOME TAX BENEFITS APPROVED BY THE DEPARTMENT UNDER THIS SECTION
MAY NOT EXCEED $35,000,000.
(2) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION, IF
THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TRANSFERS OF INCOME TAX BENEFITS APPLIED FOR BY ALL
APPLICANTS EXCEEDS THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE AMOUNT UNDER PARAGRAPH (1)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL APPROVE THE TRANSFERS IN THE
FOLLOWING MANNER:
(I) AN ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY WITH $250,000 OR
LESS OF TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS SHALL BE AUTHORIZED TO TRANSFER THE
ENTIRE AMOUNT OF THE APPLICANT’S TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS; AND
(II) AN ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY WITH MORE THAN
$250,000 OF TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS SHALL:
1. BE AUTHORIZED TO TRANSFER A MINIMUM OF
$250,000 OF ITS TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS; AND
2. BE AUTHORIZED TO TRANSFER ADDITIONAL
TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS DETERMINED BY MULTIPLYING THE APPLICANT’S
REQUESTED TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS, LESS THE MINIMUM AMOUNT
AUTHORIZED UNDER ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM, BY A FRACTION:
A. THE NUMERATOR OF WHICH IS THE TOTAL AMOUNT
OF TAX BENEFITS THAT THE DEPARTMENT IS AUTHORIZED TO APPROVE LESS THE
TOTAL AMOUNT OF TRANSFERABLE BENEFITS APPROVED UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH AND ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM; AND
B. THE DENOMINATOR OF WHICH IS THE TOTAL AMOUNT
OF TRANSFERABLE BENEFITS REQUESTED TO BE TRANSFERRED BY ALL ELIGIBLE
APPLICANTS LESS THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TRANSFERABLE BENEFITS APPROVED
UNDER ITEM (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH AND ITEM 1 OF THIS ITEM.

SENATE BILL 91 7
(3) IF THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF TRANSFERABLE TAX BENEFITS THAT
WOULD BE AUTHORIZED USING THE METHOD UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS
SUBSECTION EXCEEDS THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE AMOUNT SPECIFIED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION FOR A CALENDAR YEAR, THE DEPARTMENT,
IN COOPERATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, SHALL LIMIT THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF
TAX BENEFITS AUTHORIZED TO BE TRANSFERRED TO THE MAXIMUM AGGREGATE
AMOUNT BY APPLYING THE METHOD UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) ON AN APPORTIONED
BASIS.
(F) THE MAXIMUM LIFETIME VALUE OF TAX BENEFITS THAT AN ELIGIBLE
TECHNOLOGY COMPANY MAY TRANSFER UNDER THIS SUBTITLE IS $15,000,000.
6–1104.
(A) ON APPROVAL OF AN APPLICATION SUBMITTED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 6–1103 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ISSUE A TAX BENEFIT
TRANSFER CERTIFICATE TO THE APPLICANT IF THE APPLICANT CERTIFIES THAT, AS
OF THE DATE OF THE EXCHANGE OF THE TAX BENEFIT CERTIFICATE, THE
APPLICANT IS OPERATING AS AN ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY AND HAS NO
CURRENT INTENTION TO CEASE OPERATING AS AN ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY
COMPANY.
(B) CONSIDERATION RECEIVED BY AN ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY IN
EXCHANGE FOR A TAX BENEFIT TRANSFER CERTIFICATE SHALL BE USED BY THE
ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY TO FUND EXPENSES INCURRED IN CONNECTION
WITH OPERATING THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY IN THE STATE,
INCLUDING:
(1) EXPENSES FOR FIXED ASSETS, INCLUDING THE CONSTRUCTION,
ACQUISITION, AND DEVELOPMENT OF REAL ESTATE;
(2) MATERIAL COSTS;
(3) START–UP COSTS;
(4) EXPENSES FOR TENANT FIT–OUT;
(5) WORKING CAPITAL;
(6) SALARIES;
(7) RESEARCH AND DEVELOPMENT EXPENSES; AND

SENATE BILL 91
(8) ANY OTHER EXPENSES DETERMINED BY THE DEPARTMENT TO BE
NECESSARY TO CARRY OUT THE PURPOSES OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(C) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL REQUIRE AN UNAFFILIATED TAXPAYER
THAT ACQUIRES A TAX BENEFIT TRANSFER CERTIFICATE ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION TO ENTER INTO A WRITTEN AGREEMENT WITH THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY
COMPANY CONCERNING THE TERMS AND CONDITIONS OF THE CONSIDERATION PAID
IN EXCHANGE FOR THE CERTIFICATE.
(2) THE WRITTEN AGREEMENT REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY CONTAIN TERMS CONCERNING THE MAINTENANCE BY THE
ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY OF A HEADQUARTERS OR A BASE OF OPERATIONS
IN THE STATE.
6–1105.
THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, MAY
RECAPTURE, IN WHOLE OR IN PART, THE AMOUNT OF THE TAX BENEFIT TRANSFER
CERTIFICATE FROM THE ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY THAT TRANSFERRED
TAX BENEFITS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBTITLE IN THE EVENT THAT THE
ELIGIBLE TECHNOLOGY COMPANY:
(1) FAILS TO USE THE CONSIDERATION RECEIVED FOR THE
TRANSFER OF TAX BENEFITS AS REQUIRED UNDER THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(2) FAILS TO MAINTAIN A HEADQUARTERS OR A BASE OF OPERATION
IN THE STATE DURING THE 5 YEARS FOLLOWING THE RECEIPT OF THE
CONSIDERATION, UNLESS THE FAILURE TO MAINTAIN A HEADQUARTERS OR A BASE
OF OPERATION IN THE STATE IS DUE TO THE LIQUIDATION OF THE ELIGIBLE
TECHNOLOGY COMPANY.
6–1106.
THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE COMPTROLLER, SHALL
ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS SUBTITLE.
Article – Tax – General
10–721.
(b) (2) Subject to the limitations of this section, an individual or a corporation
may claim credits against the State income tax in an amount equal to 10% of the amount
by which the Maryland qualified research and development expenses paid or incurred by

SENATE BILL 91 9
the individual or corporation during the taxable year exceed the Maryland base amount for
the individual or corporation.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, if the credit
allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds the State income tax for that taxable
year, an individual or corporation may apply the excess as a credit against the State income
tax for succeeding taxable years until the earlier of:
(i) the full amount of the excess is used; or
(ii) the expiration of the 7th taxable year after the taxable year in
which the Maryland qualified research and development expense was incurred.
(2) If the credit allowed under this section in any taxable year exceeds the
State income tax for that taxable year, a small business may claim a refund in the amount
of the excess.
(3) THE CREDIT ALLOWED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE
TRANSFERRED TO ANOTHER TAXPAYER IN ACCORDANCE WITH TITLE 6, SUBTITLE
11 OF THE ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2024.